Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3409
Power of attorney; medical record.

The power of attorney for health care, when its existence becomes known, shall be made a part of the principal's medical record with any health care provider in or of which the principal is a patient or resides.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 23.